South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S961.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Catch limits SECTION 1.    Section 50-5-1705(D) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (D) It is unlawful for a person to take or have in possession more than one red drum in any one day, not to exceed two red drum in any one day on any boat. Size limits SECTION 2.    Section 50-5-1710(B)(3) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (3) red drum (Sciaenops ocellatus) (channel bass or spottail bass) of less than eighteen inches in total length, or more than twenty-five inches in total length; Methods of taking saltwater game fish SECTION 3.    Section 50-5-1700(B) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (B)(1) It is unlawful to take or attempt to take saltwater gamefish in the waters of this State, except by: (a) hand-held hook and line, to include rod and reel and pole, and when using natural bait with a hook size of 4/0 or larger, the hook must be a nonoffset, nonstainless steel circle hook; or (b) gigging during legal periods. (2) Any saltwater gamefish taken by any other means must be returned immediately to the water. Deer hunting SECTION 4.A.    Section 50-9-650(B)(2) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (2)(a) With the purchase of a South Carolina hunting license and a big game permit, a resident shall be issued three individual antlerless deer tags and three unrestricted individual antlered deer tags. Persons under the age of sixteen, lifetime, and gratis licensees may receive these tags upon request to the department. Residents, including persons under the age of sixteen, lifetime, and gratis licensees also may purchase: (i) two antler restriction individual antlered deer tags valid for deer with a minimum of four points on one antler or a minimum twelve-inch inside antler spread for five dollars per tag; and (ii) additional individual antlerless deer tags for five dollars per tag. (b) Fees for nonresident deer tags are as follows: (i) fifty dollars for the first antlered deer tag and twenty dollars for each additional antlered deer tag up to a maximum of four tags; two of which must be an antler restriction individual antlered deer tag valid only for deer with a minimum of four points on one antler or a minimum twelve-inch inside antler spread; and (ii) ten dollars per individual antlerless deer tag. B. This SECTION takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Time effective SECTION 5.    Except as otherwise provided in this act, this act takes effect on July 1, 2026. Ratified the 15th day of May, 2026. Approved the 19th day of May, 2026. __________